Mississippi, session 2026, HB1603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 89-10-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-10-5.  * * *(1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any squatter who commits trespass or otherwise enters or remains on another person's property for a short period of time without the authority or consent of the owner or without the authority or consent of a person designated by the owner, shall not accrue any property rights based on the trespass or unauthorized entrance. * * *(2) The right to manage, control or receive payments for any use of real property shall only belong to the owner of the property or a person designated by the owner for such purposes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.